Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB217.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 141 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, any taxpayer
required to file a return under KRS 141.180 who is entitled to an income tax
refund and who desires to contribute to the animal control and care fund created
in KRS 258.119 may designate an amount, not to exceed the amount of the
refund, to be paid to the fund. A designation made under this section shall not
affect the income tax liability of the taxpayer, but it shall reduce the income tax
refund by the amount designated.
(2) The tax refund designation authorized by this section shall be printed on the face
of the Kentucky individual income tax form or an accompanying schedule.
(3) The instructions accompanying the individual income tax return shall include a
description of the animal control and care fund and the purposes for which the
funds from the income tax checkoff may be used.
(4) The department shall, by July 1, 2027, and by July 1 of each year thereafter,
transfer the funds designated by taxpayers under this section to the animal
control and care fund created in KRS 258.119.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 10/6/2025 3:54 PM Jacketed